Washington statutes.
RCW 43.34.080

Capitol campus design advisory committee—Generally.

(1) The capitol campus design advisory committee is established as an advisory group to the capitol committee and the director of enterprise services to review programs, planning, design, and landscaping of state capitol facilities and grounds and to make recommendations that will contribute to the attainment of architectural, aesthetic, functional, and environmental excellence in design and maintenance of capitol facilities on campus and located in neighboring communities.

(2) The advisory committee shall consist of the following persons who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director of enterprise services:

(a) Two architects;

(b) A landscape architect; and

(c) An urban planner.

The director of enterprise services shall appoint the chair and vice chair and shall provide the staff and resources necessary for implementing this section. The advisory committee shall meet at least once every ninety days and at the call of the chair.

The members of the committee shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.220 and 44.04.120.

(3) The advisory committee shall also consist of the secretary of state and two members of the house of representatives, one from each caucus, who shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus, who shall be appointed by the president of the senate.

(4) The advisory committee shall review plans and designs affecting state capitol facilities as they are developed. The advisory committee's review shall include:

(a) The process of solicitation and selection of appropriate professional design services including design-build proposals;

(b) Compliance with the capitol campus master plan and design concepts as adopted by the capitol committee;

(c) The design, siting, and grouping of state capitol facilities relative to the service needs of state government and the impact upon the local community's economy, environment, traffic patterns, and other factors;

(d) The relationship of overall state capitol facility planning to the respective comprehensive plans for long-range urban development of the cities of Olympia, Lacey, and Tumwater, and Thurston county; and

(e) Landscaping plans and designs, including planting proposals, street furniture, sculpture, monuments, and access to the capitol campus and buildings.

(5) For development of the property known as the 1063 block, the committee may review the proposal selected by the department of enterprise services but must not propose changes that will affect the scope, budget, or schedule of the project.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7015; 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 34; 1990 c 93 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 19: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [July 1, 2013]." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7044.]

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.